Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 7. Assignment of Partnership Interests

§ 3461.
Nature of partnership interest.

A partnership interest is personal property.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3462.
Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all his or her partnership interest.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3463.
Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This chapter does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his or her partnership interest.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3464.
Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement, or all other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this chapter. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of his or her assignor to make and return contributions as provided in subchapters 5 and 6 of this title. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time he or she became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his or her liability to the limited partnership under sections 3417 and 3442 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

1997, No. 149

, § 6 makes this section effective on January 1, 1999, and further provides that this section applies only to assignments made after January 1, 1999.

§ 3465.
Power of estate of deceased or partner who is incompetent.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him or her to be incompetent to manage his or her person or his or her property, the partner’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all of the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling his or her estate or administering his or her property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 41.